Maryland, session 2025, SB0556.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
8–906.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY, PRESENT A FALSE DEED, LEASE
AGREEMENT, OR OTHER INSTRUMENT PURPORTING TO CONVEY AN INTEREST IN
REAL PROPERTY IN ORDER TO HOLD POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY;
(2) LEASE TO ANOTHER REAL PROPERTY THE PERSON DOES NOT OWN
OR IS NOT AUTHORIZED TO OFFER FOR LEASE; OR
(3) LIST OR ADVERTISE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY FOR SALE
KNOWING THAT THE PURPORTED SELLER IS NOT THE LAWFUL OWNER OF THE
PROPERTY.
(B) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A)(2) OR (3) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 30 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 OR
BOTH.
Article – Real Property
14–132.1.
(A) PRIOR TO THE FILING OF A COMPLAINT WITH THE COURT UNDER §
14–132 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON CLAIMING THAT ANOTHER IS IN WRONGFUL
POSSESSION OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY MAY REQUEST THE SHERIFF TO
IMMEDIATELY REMOVE THE OTHER PERSON IF:
(1) THE PERSON CLAIMING POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY IS THE
PROPERTY OWNER OR AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE PROPERTY OWNER;

SENATE BILL 556 3
(2) THE PERSON IN POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY IS NOT
AUTHORIZED TO BE ON THE PROPERTY OR UNLAWFULLY ENTERED AND REMAINED
ON OR OCCUPIED THE PROPERTY;
(3) THE PROPERTY WAS NOT OPEN TO THE PUBLIC AT THE TIME THE
UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPATION OF THE PROPERTY BEGAN;
(4) THE PERSON CLAIMING POSSESSION DIRECTED THE PERSON IN
POSSESSION TO VACATE THE PROPERTY;
(5) THE PERSON IN POSSESSION IS NOT A CURRENT OR FORMER
TENANT OF THE PROPERTY UNDER A LEASE AGREEMENT WITH THE PERSON
CLAIMING POSSESSION; AND
(6) THERE IS NO PENDING LITIGATION RELATING TO THE PROPERTY
BETWEEN THE PERSON CLAIMING POSSESSION AND THE PERSON IN POSSESSION.
(B) A REQUEST MADE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE:
(I) A COPY OF THE REQUESTER’S GOVERNMENT
IDENTIFICATION;
(II) EVIDENCE OF OWNERSHIP OF THE PROPERTY; AND
(III) IF THE PERSON MAKING THE REQUEST IS ACTING AS AN
AGENT OF THE OWNER, EVIDENCE OF AGENCY; AND
(2) BE SIGNED BY THE REQUESTER UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY.
(C) ON RECEIPT OF A REQUEST UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION,
THE SHERIFF SHALL VERIFY THAT THE PERSON SUBMITTING THE REQUEST IS THE
OWNER OF THE PROPERTY OR AN AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE OWNER.
(D) IF THE SHERIFF VERIFIES A REQUEST UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, THE SHERIFF SHALL, WITHOUT DELAY, SERVE NOTICE TO IMMEDIATELY
VACATE THE PROPERTY TO THE OCCUPANT OF THE PROPERTY AND DELIVER
POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO THE REQUESTER.
(E) SERVICE OF NOTICE TO IMMEDIATELY VACATE UNDER SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION MAY BE MADE BY HAND DELIVERY OR BY PROMINENTLY POSTING
THE NOTICE ON THE FRONT DOOR OR OTHER ENTRY TO THE PROPERTY.

SENATE BILL 556
(F) THE SHERIFF SHALL ATTEMPT TO VERIFY THE IDENTITY OF ANY
PERSON OCCUPYING THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF SERVICE OF NOTICE TO
IMMEDIATELY VACATE AND MAY, IF APPROPRIATE, ARREST ANY PERSON FOUND
OCCUPYING THE PROPERTY FOR TRESPASS, OUTSTANDING WARRANTS, OR ANY
OTHER LEGAL CAUSE.
(G) AFTER NOTICE TO IMMEDIATELY VACATE HAS BEEN DELIVERED, THE
REQUESTOR MAY REQUEST THAT THE SHERIFF STAND BY TO KEEP THE PEACE
WHILE THE REQUESTOR CHANGES THE LOCKS AND REMOVES ANY PERSONAL
PROPERTY FROM THE PREMISES.
(H) (1) A PERSON MAY BRING SUIT FOR WRONGFUL REMOVAL UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(2) A PERSON HARMED BY WRONGFUL REMOVAL MAY BE RESTORED
TO POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY AND MAY RECOVER:
(I) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(II) THREE TIMES THE AMOUNT OF THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF
RENT OF THE PROPERTY; AND
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COURT COSTS.
(I) (1) A SHERIFF IS NOT LIABLE TO ANY PARTY FOR DAMAGES TO OR THE
LOSS OR DESTRUCTION OF PROPERTY INCURRED IN PERFORMING THE SHERIFF’S
DUTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) AN OWNER OR AUTHORIZED AGENT OF AN OWNER IS NOT LIABLE
TO AN OCCUPANT OR ANY OTHER PARTY FOR DAMAGE TO OR THE LOSS OR
DESTRUCTION OF PERSONAL PROPERTY REMOVED UNDER THIS SECTION UNLESS
THE REMOVAL WAS UNLAWFUL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.